Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6902.01
Victim of abuse, sexual abuse,
or child abuse or neglect; attending physician; duties; liability.

If the
pregnant woman declares in a signed written statement that she is a victim
of abuse as defined in section 28-351, sexual abuse as defined in section
28-367, or child abuse or neglect as defined in section 28-710 by either of
her parents or her legal guardians, then the attending physician shall obtain
the notarized written consent required by section 71-6902 from a grandparent
specified by the pregnant woman. The physician who intends to perform the
abortion shall certify in the pregnant woman's medical record that he or she
has received the written declaration of abuse or neglect. Any physician relying
in good faith on a written statement under this section shall not be civilly
or criminally liable under sections 71-6901 to 71-6911 for failure to obtain
consent. If such a declaration is made, the attending physician or his or
her agent shall inform the pregnant woman of his or her duty to notify the
proper authorities pursuant to sections 28-372 and 28-711.

Laws 2011, LB690, § 5.